Montana, session 2025, SB410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 7 6] may be cited as the "Montana
Genomic Security Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Purpose. The purpose of [sections 1 through 7 6] is to ensure that
blacklisted adversary military companies do not gain access to American genetic information.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Legislative intent. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that:
(a) the state oppose the collection and analysis of genetic information for military and surveillance
purposes by the People ' s Republic of China ; and
(b) the state support sanctions imposed by the United States department of commerce and the
United States department of defense on companies engaged in the collection and analysis of genetic
information for use by the military and surveillance state of the People ' s Republic of China.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 410

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0410.3

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 7 6], the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Company" means:
(a) a for-profit sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture,
limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited liability company, including a wholly owned subsidiary,
majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or affiliate of those entities or business associations that exists to
make a profit; or
(b) a nonprofit organization.
(2) "Domiciled" means:
(a) the country in which a company is registered and headquartered;
(b) where the company's affairs are primarily completed, or
(c) where the majority of ownership share is held.
(3) "Foreign adversary" means the nations specified in 15 CFR 791.4 as of January 1, 2025.
(4) "Genetic sequencer" means a device or platform used to conduct genetic sequencing,
resequencing, isolation, or other genetic research.
(5) "Genetic sequencing" means any method to determine the identity and order of nucleotide
bases in the human genome.
(6) "Genome" means DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) or RNA (ribonucleic acid) found in human cells.
(7) "Medical facility" means a facility for the delivery of health services that:
(a) receives state funding, including interagency pass-through appropriations from the federal
government;
(b) is registered with the state to provide health care services in the state; or
(c) conducts research or testing on, with, or relating to genetic sequencing of the human genome.
(8) "Operational and research software" means computer programs used for the operation, control,
analysis, or other necessary functions of genetic sequencing or genetic sequencers.
(9) "Research facility" means a facility that conducts research on, with, or relating to genetic
sequencing or the human genome.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 410

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0410.3
(10) "Software" means a program or routine, or a set of one or more programs or routines, that are
used or intended for use to cause one or more computers or pieces of computer-related peripheral equipment,
or any combination of these, to perform a task or set of tasks as it relates to genetic sequencing or genetic
sequencers.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Prohibition on certain genetic sequencers and genetic sequencing
technologies. (1) For conducting genetic sequencing, no medical facility or research facility in the state may
utilize genetic sequencers or any operational or research software used for genetic sequencing that are
produced in or by a foreign adversary, a state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, a company domiciled
within a foreign adversary, or an owned or controlled subsidiary or affiliate of a company domiciled within a
foreign adversary.
(2) Any genetic sequencers and operational and research software used for genetic sequencers or
genetic sequencing devices that are prohibited under subsection (1) must be removed and replaced with
genetic sequencers and operational and research software used for genetic sequencers or genetic sequencing
that do not violate the prohibit ion under subsection (1).
(3) A medical facility or research facility in the state may request a reimbursement for the cost of
replacement of the equipment and software prohibited under subsection (1 ) from the state treasurer, provided
the request includes purchase orders that were executed at least 90 days prior to [ the effective date of this a ct
].

NEW SECTION. SECTION 4. PROHIBITION ON CERTAIN GENETIC SEQUENCERS AND GENETIC SEQUENCING
TECHNOLOGIES. (1) FOR CONDUCTING GENETIC SEQUENCING, NO MEDICAL FACILITY OR RESEARCH FACILITY IN THE
STATE MAY UTILIZE GENETIC SEQUENCERS OR ANY OPERATIONAL OR RESEARCH SOFTWARE USED FOR GENETIC
SEQUENCING THAT ARE PRODUCED IN OR BY A FOREIGN ADVERSARY, A STATE-OWNED ENTERPRISE OF A FOREIGN
ADVERSARY, A COMPANY DOMICILED WITHIN A FOREIGN ADVERSARY, OR AN OWNED OR CONTROLLED SUBSIDIARY OR
AFFILIATE OF A COMPANY DOMICILED WITHIN A FOREIGN ADVERSARY.
(2) ANY GENETIC SEQUENCERS AND OPERATIONAL AND RESEARCH SOFTWARE USED FOR GENETIC
SEQUENCERS OR GENETIC SEQUENCING DEVICES THAT ARE PROHIBITED UNDER SUBSECTION (1) MUST BE REMOVED AND
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 410

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0410.3
REPLACED WITH GENETIC SEQUENCERS AND OPERATIONAL AND RESEARCH SOFTWARE USED FOR GENETIC SEQUENCERS
OR GENETIC SEQUENCING THAT DO NOT VIOLATE THE PROHIBITION UNDER SUBSECTION (1).

NEW SECTION. SECTION 4. REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS FOR GENETIC SEQUENCERS AND GENETIC
SEQUENCING TECHNOLOGIES. (1) A MEDICAL FACILITY OR RESEARCH FACILITY IN THE STATE UTILIZING GENETIC
SEQUENCERS OR ANY OPERATIONAL OR RESEARCH SOFTWARE USED FOR GENETIC SEQUENCING SHALL COMPLETE THE
CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN [SECTION 6].
(2) AS PART OF THE CERTIFICATION OF COMPLIANCE, A MEDICAL FACILITY OR RESEARCH FACILITY SHALL
DISCLOSE TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL:
(A) WHERE ANY GENETIC SEQUENCERS OR ANY OPERATIONAL OR RESEARCH SOFTWARE USED FOR
GENETIC SEQUENCING IS PRODUCED;
(B) WHERE THE ENTITY PRODUCING ANY GENETIC SEQUENCERS OR ANY OPERATIONAL OR RESEARCH
SOFTWARE USED FOR GENETIC SEQUENCING IS DOMICILED; AND
(C) WHETHER THE ENTITY PRODUCING ANY GENETIC SEQUENCERS OR ANY OPERATIONAL OR RESEARCH
SOFTWARE USED FOR GENETIC SEQUENCING IS PARTIALLY OR WHOLLY O WNED BY, CONTROLLED BY, OR AFFILIATED
WITH, OR IS A SUBSIDIARY OF, A DIFFERENT ENTITY AND WHERE THE PARENT ENTITY IS DOMICILED.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Requirements on storage of genetic information. (1) Storage of all
genetic sequencing data from the state must be restricted to the geographic location of the United States. Other
than open data, genetic sequencing data from the state may not be remotely accessed from outside the United
States unless approved in writing by the individuals whose data would be accessed.
(2) Medical facilities, research institutions, and other companies and entities storing genetic
sequencing data, including through contracts with third-party data storage companies, shall ensure the security
of genetic sequencing data using reasonable encryption methods, restrictions on access, and other
cybersecurity best practices.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Requirement of certification of compliance -- penalties for
noncompliance -- powers of attorney general. (1) (a) Each medical facility and research institution covered
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 410

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0410.3
under [sections 1 through 7 6] shall provide legal documentation from an attorney to the attorney general by
[December 31 following the effective date of this act], and annually thereafter, certifying that the facility or
institution is in compliance with [sections 4 AND 5 and 6].
(b) Failure to provide documentation by the deadline constitutes perjury.
(2) (a) A medical facility or research institution that violates the provisions of [section 5 4] shall be
fined $10,000 for each violation, enforceable from the first day of the first full fiscal year after [the effective date
of this act].
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "violation" means each unique instance of an
individual's genome having undergone genetic sequencing or analysis using prohibited genetic sequencers or
prohibited operational and research software used for genetic sequencers or genetic sequencing.
(3) An entity that knowingly violates the provisions of [section 6 5] by storing genetic sequencing
data outside of the United States shall be fined $10,000 for each violation, enforceable beginning the first day of
the first full fiscal year after [the effective date of this act].
(4) (a) A person may notify the attorney general of a violation or a potential violation of [sections 1
through 7 6]. If that person is an employee of the entity accused of a violation, the person must be afforded all
the protections of a whistleblower pursuant to 30-10-1111.
(b) If a person is a patient or research subject of an entity found guilty of a violation of [section 5 4]
or [section 6 5] and that person's genetic information was used in the violation, that person is entitled to recover
damages of not less than $5,000 for each unique use of the person's genomic information.
(5) The attorney general has the authority to investigate allegations of violations of [sections 1
through 7 6].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 7 6] are intended to be
codified as a new part in Title 30, chapter 23, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 23, apply to [sections 1
through 7 6].

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 410

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0410.3
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 410